Utah statutes.
41-12a-507.   Cooperation with other states.
(1)  When a nonresident's operating privilege is suspended under this chapter,
the department shall send a certified copy of the record of the action to the
official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates
in the state in which the nonresident resides, if the law of the other state
provides for action similar to that provided for in Subsection (2).
(2)  Upon receipt of certification from the official of another state that the
operating privilege of a Utah resident has been suspended in the other state
for failure to deposit post-accident security for the payment of judgments
arising out of a motor vehicle accident, under circumstances which would
require the deposit in Utah, the department shall suspend the license of the
resident if he was the operator, and all of his registrations if he was the
owner of a motor vehicle involved in the accident.  These suspensions continue
until the Utah resident furnishes evidence of his compliance with the law of
the other state relating to the deposit of post-accident security.
